Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB290.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 431 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Criminal history provider":
1. Means a person or an organization that:
a. Compiles a criminal history report and uses, publishes, or
provides the report to a person or an organization other than a
law enforcement agency or another criminal history provider; or
b. Regularly publishes criminal history information on the internet
or in any public forum, or regularly makes criminal history
information available through the internet; and
2. Does not include a law enforcement agency, any governmental entity,
or any person who gathers, records, compiles, or disseminates
criminal history information solely for journalistic, academic,
governmental, or legal research purposes;
(b) "Eligible conviction" means a conviction of:
1. A Class D felony under KRS 17.175, 186.990, 194A.505, 194B.505,
217.181, 217.207, 217.208, 218A.140, 218A.1415, 218A.1416,
218A.1417, 218A.1418, 218A.1423, 218A.1439, 218A.282, 218A.284,
218A.286, 218A.320, 218A.322, 218A.324, 218A.500, 244.165, 286.11-
057, 304.47-025, 324.990, 365.241, 434.155, 434.675, 434.850,
434.872, 511.040, 512.020, 514.030, 514.040, 514.050, 514.060,
514.065, 514.070, 514.080, 514.090, 514.100, 514.110, 514.120,
514.140, 514.150, 514.160, 516.030, 516.060, 516.090, 516.108,
517.120, 518.040, 522.040, 524.100, 525.113, 526.020, 526.030,
Page 1 of 20
XXXX 2/26/2026 6:36 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1279
528.020, 528.040, 528.050, 530.010, or 530.050; or
2. A misdemeanor or violation that is not:
a. A conviction of an offense under KRS Chapter 510 or of
criminal attempt, solicitation, conspiracy, facilitation, or
complicity to commit an offense under KRS Chapter 510; or
b. A conviction under KRS 154A.440(1), 403.763, 456.180, 508.030,
508.050, 508.070, 508.080, 508.120, 508.150, 508.152, 511.085,
514.030, 514.040, 514.050, 514.060, 514.065, 514.070, 514.080,
514.090, 514.100, 514.110, 514.120, 516.040, 516.070, 516.110,
516.130, 517.020, 517.030, 517.040, 517.050, 517.060, 517.070,
517.080, 517.090, 517.110, 528.030, 528.060, 528.070, 528.080,
528.110, 528.120, or 529.080;
(c) "Expungable conviction" means an eligible conviction if:
1. a. Five (5) years have passed since the completion of the person's
term of incarceration, probation, or parole for the eligible
conviction, whichever occurs later; or
b. Seven (7) years have passed since final judgment was entered for
the eligible conviction if the completion date for the term of
incarceration, probation, or parole is unavailable;
2. An eligible conviction is subject to enhancement for a second or
subsequent offense and:
a. The law specifies a period of enhancement, the enhancement
period for the offense has expired; or
b. The law does not specify a period of enhancement, ten (10) years
have passed since final judgment was entered for the eligible
conviction;
3. The person has not been convicted of a felony or misdemeanor in the
Page 2 of 20
XXXX 2/26/2026 6:36 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1279
preceding five (5) years;
4. A proceeding concerning a felony or misdemeanor is not pending or
being instituted against the person; and
5. The offense that resulted in the eligible conviction was committed on
or after January 1, 2027.
(2) Beginning August 2, 2032, and on the first business day of each month
thereafter, the clerk of the court shall:
(a) Generate a list of all expungable convictions in his or her county that have
not already been expunged or have been excluded from expungement under
this section as the result of an objection filed under subsection (4)(c) of this
section;
(b) No later than the fifth business day of the month, notify the office of the
Commonwealth's attorney or county attorney that prosecuted the case of
any expungable convictions; and
(c) Provide a copy of the list of expungable convictions to the courts of original
jurisdiction over the expungable convictions.
(3) Within ninety (90) days of notice of the list of expungable convictions under
subsection (2) of this section, the Commonwealth's attorney or the county
attorney shall:
(a) Notify the victim, if any identified victim exists, of the pending expungement
of any eligible conviction, the right to file an objection, and the deadline for
filing an objection;
(b) Be authorized to obtain from the Transportation Cabinet without the
payment of any fee, the address of any identified victim of an expungable
conviction from any vehicle operator's license issued to that identified
victim; and
(c) Have the discretion to, or at the request of a victim, file with the court of
Page 3 of 20
XXXX 2/26/2026 6:36 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1279
original jurisdiction any objection to the expungable conviction.
(4) Within thirty (30) days after the deadline for filing an objection under subsection
(3) of this section, the court of original jurisdiction shall:
(a) Review the court record of the expungable conviction;
(b) If no objection to the expungement has been filed:
1. Enter an order vacating the judgment and dismissing with prejudice
any eligible conviction meeting the requirement for an expungable
conviction under this section; and
2. Order expunged all records of the expungable conviction in the
custody of the court and any records in the custody of any other
agency or official or criminal history provider; or
(c) 1. If an objection to the expungement has been filed, the
Commonwealth's attorney or the county attorney shall send a notice of
each objection to the Administrative Office of the Courts and the
eligible conviction shall be excluded from expungement under this
section.
2. Any eligible conviction excluded from expungement under this
paragraph shall remain eligible for expungement under Section 3 or 5
of this Act, as applicable.
(5) Upon entry of the order expunging a conviction, the clerk of the court shall:
(a) Expunge the records in his or her possession; and
(b) Send notice of entry of the order of expungement to:
1. The person previously convicted in the expunged conviction and the
person's counsel of record, if any, if notice was requested by the
person and an address provided in the record for this purpose;
2. The Administrative Office of the Courts;
3. The Department of Kentucky State Police;
Page 4 of 20
XXXX 2/26/2026 6:36 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1279
4. The office of the Commonwealth's attorney or county attorney that
prosecuted the case; and
5. Any other agency, criminal history provider, or person as directed by
the court in the order of expungement.
(6) Within thirty (30) days of either notice of entry by the clerk of the court or written
notice by the person previously convicted in the expunged conviction, the agency,
criminal history provider, or any other person or organization shall comply with
the orders of the court as required by law.
(7) Following entry of an order vacating and expunging, the court and other
agencies shall cause records to be deleted or removed so that the matter shall not
appear on official state performed background checks. The court and other
agencies shall reply to any inquiry that no record exists on the matter. The person
whose record is expunged shall not have to disclose the fact of the record or any
matter relating thereto on an application for employment, credit, or other type of
application. If the person is not prohibited from voting for any other reason, the
person's ability to vote shall be restored and the person may register to vote.
(8) The Administrative Office of the Courts shall establish form notices and orders to
be used to facilitate uniformity in the process and accurate data collection for
automated expungement under this section
(9) This section shall not preclude any person from filing an application for
expungement pursuant to KRS 431.073 or a petition for expungement pursuant
to KRS 431.078.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 431 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
By January 1 and June 15 of each year beginning in 2027, the Administrative Office of
the Courts and the Department of Kentucky State Police shall submit a joint report to
the Legislative Research Commission for referral to the Interim Joint Committee on
Page 5 of 20
XXXX 2/26/2026 6:36 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1279
Judiciary or the Senate and House Standing Committees on Judiciary, as appropriate,
that contains the following:
(1) The status of the implementation of the processes established in Section 1 of this
Act, including internal milestones that have been reached;
(2) The progress of collaboration with relevant implementing stakeholders;
(3) Identification of challenges encountered with implementation and the plan for
resolution of the challenges in a timely manner;
(4) Beginning January 1, 2033, the number of expungement orders entered pursuant
to Section 1 of this Act;
(5) The number of expungement orders entered pursuant to Section 3 or 5 of this Act
or KRS 431.076, including the total number of times the filing fee and
expungement fee were waived pursuant to subsection (12) of Section 3 of this Act
and the filing fee was waived pursuant to subsection (8) of Section 5 of this Act;
and
(6) Nonidentifying demographic information of the persons previously convicted in
the expunged convictions and the characteristics of the expunged convictions for
all records identified under subsections (4) and (5) of this section.
Section 3. KRS 431.073 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Any person who has been:
(a) Convicted of a Class D felony violation of KRS 17.175, 186.990, 194A.505,
194B.505, 217.181, 217.207, 217.208, 218A.140, 218A.1415, 218A.1416,
218A.1417, 218A.1418, 218A.1423, 218A.1439, 218A.282, 218A.284,
218A.286, 218A.320, 218A.322, 218A.324, 218A.500, 244.165, 286.11-057,
304.47-025, 324.990, 365.241, 434.155, 434.675, 434.850, 434.872, 511.040,
512.020, 514.030, 514.040, 514.050, 514.060, 514.065, 514.070, 514.080,
514.090, 514.100, 514.110, 514.120, 514.140, 514.150, 514.160, 516.030,
516.060, 516.090, 516.108, 517.120, 518.040, 522.040, 524.100, 525.113,
Page 6 of 20
XXXX 2/26/2026 6:36 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1279
526.020, 526.030, 528.020, 528.040, 528.050, 530.010, or 530.050;
(b) Convicted of a series of Class D felony violations of one (1) or more statutes
enumerated in paragraph (a) of this subsection arising from a single incident;
(c) Granted a full pardon; or
(d) Convicted of a Class D felony, or an offense prior to January 1, 1975 which
was punishable by not more than five (5) years' incarceration, which was not a
violation of KRS 189A.010, 508.032, or 519.055, abuse of public office, a sex
offense, or an offense committed against a child, and did not result in serious
bodily injury or death; or of multiple felony offenses eligible under this
paragraph;
may file with the court in which he or she was convicted an application to have the
judgment vacated. The application shall be filed as a motion in the original criminal
case. The person shall be informed of the right at the time of adjudication.
(2) (a) A verified application to have the judgment vacated under this section shall be
filed no sooner than five (5) years after the completion of the person's
sentence, or five (5) years after the successful completion of the person's
probation or parole, whichever occurs later.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (12) of this section, upon the payment of
the filing fee and the filing of the application, the Circuit Court clerk shall
serve a notice of filing upon the office of the Commonwealth's attorney or
county attorney that prosecuted the case and the county attorney of the county
where the judgment was entered. The office of the Commonwealth's attorney
or county attorney that prosecuted the case shall file a response within sixty
(60) days after being served with the notice of filing. That time period may be
extended for good cause, but the hearing on the application to vacate the
judgment shall occur no later than one hundred twenty (120) days following
the filing of the application. The inability to determine the location of the
Page 7 of 20
XXXX 2/26/2026 6:36 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1279
crime victim shall constitute good cause for an extension of time. No hearing
upon the merits of the application shall be scheduled until the
Commonwealth's response has been filed, or if no response is received, no
later than one hundred twenty (120) days after the filing of the application.
(c) In any case in which the Commonwealth objects that the application is grossly
incomplete, the court shall order the person or agency originating the
application to supplement the application.
(3) Upon the filing of the Commonwealth's response to an application, or if no
response is received, no later than one hundred twenty (120) days after the filing of
the application, the court shall set a date for a hearing and the Circuit Court clerk
shall notify the office of the Commonwealth's attorney or county attorney that
prosecuted the case. The office of the Commonwealth's attorney or county attorney
that prosecuted the case shall notify the victim of the crime, if there was an
identified victim. The Commonwealth's attorney or county attorney shall be
authorized to obtain without payment of any fee information from the
Transportation Cabinet regarding the crime victim's address on file regarding any
vehicle operator's license issued to that person.
(4) (a) In an application pursuant to subsection (1)(d) of this section, upon the filing
of the Commonwealth's response objecting to the vacating of a judgment and
expungement of a record, the court shall schedule a hearing within one
hundred twenty (120) days of the Commonwealth's response. The prosecutor
shall specify in the objection the reasons for believing a denial of the
application is justified. At the hearing at which the applicant or his or her
attorney must be present, the applicant must prove by clear and convincing
evidence that:
1. Vacating the judgment and expunging the record is consistent with the
welfare and safety of the public;
Page 8 of 20
XXXX 2/26/2026 6:36 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1279
2. The action is supported by his or her behavior since the conviction or
convictions, as evidenced that he or she has been active in rehabilitative
activities in prison and is living a law-abiding life since release;
3. The vacation and expungement is warranted by the interests of justice;
and
4. Any other matter deemed appropriate or necessary by the court to make
a determination regarding the petition for expungement is met.
(b) At the hearing, the applicant may testify as to the specific adverse
consequences he or she may be subject to if the application is denied. The
court may hear testimony of witnesses and any other matter the court deems
proper and relevant to its determination regarding the application. The
Commonwealth may present proof of any extraordinary circumstances that
exist to deny the application. A victim of any offense listed in the application
shall have an opportunity to be heard at any hearing held under this section.
(c) If the court determines that circumstances warrant vacation and expungement
and that the harm otherwise resulting to the applicant clearly outweighs the
public interest in the criminal history record information being publicly
available, then the original conviction or convictions shall be vacated and the
records shall be expunged. The order of expungement shall not preclude a
prosecutor's office from retaining a nonpublic record for law enforcement
purposes only.
(5) The court may order the judgment vacated, and if the judgment is vacated the court
shall dismiss with prejudice any charges which are eligible for expungement under
subsection (1) of this section or KRS 431.076 or 431.078, and, upon full payment of
the fee in subsection (11) of this section, except as provided in subsection (12) of
this section, order expunged all records in the custody of the court and any records
in the custody of any other agency or official, including law enforcement records, if
Page 9 of 20
XXXX 2/26/2026 6:36 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1279
the court finds that:
(a) The person had not in the five (5) years prior to the filing of the application to
have the judgment vacated been convicted of a felony or a misdemeanor;
(b) No proceeding concerning a felony or misdemeanor is pending or being
instituted against the person; and
(c) For an application pursuant to subsection (1)(d) of this section, the person has
been rehabilitated and poses no significant threat of recidivism.
(6) If the court has received a response from the office of the Commonwealth's attorney
or county attorney that prosecuted the case stating no objection to the application to
have the judgment vacated, or if one hundred twenty (120) days have elapsed since
the filing of the application and no response has been received from the victim or
the office of the Commonwealth's attorney or county attorney that prosecuted the
case, the court may, without a hearing, vacate the judgment in the manner
established in subsection (5) of this section.
(7) Upon entry of an order vacating and expunging a conviction, the original conviction
shall be vacated and, upon full payment of the fee in subsection (11) of this section,
except as provided in subsection (12) of this section, the record shall be expunged.
The court and other agencies shall cause records to be deleted or removed from
their computer systems so that the matter shall not appear on official state-
performed background checks. The court and other agencies shall reply to any
inquiry that no record exists on the matter. The person whose record is expunged
shall not have to disclose the fact of the record or any matter relating thereto on an
application for employment, credit, or other type of application. If the person is not
prohibited from voting for any other reason, the person's ability to vote shall be
restored and the person may register to vote.
(8) An order vacating a conviction under this section shall not extend or revive an
expired statute of limitations, shall not constitute a finding of legal error regarding
Page 10 of 20
XXXX 2/26/2026 6:36 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1279
the proceedings leading to or resulting in the conviction, shall not nullify any
findings of fact or conclusions of law made by the trial court or any appellate court
regarding the conviction, and shall not constitute a finding of innocence regarding
the conviction.
(9) The Administrative Office of the Courts shall establish a form application to be
used in filing an application to have judgment vacated and records expunged.
(10) Except as provided in subsection (12) of this section, the filing fee for an
application to have judgment vacated and records expunged shall be fifty dollars
($50), which shall be deposited into a trust and agency account for deputy clerks
and shall not be refundable.
(11) (a) Except as provided in subsection (12) of this section, upon the issuance of an
order vacating and expunging a conviction pursuant to this section, the
applicant shall be charged an expungement fee of two hundred fifty dollars
($250), which may be payable by an installment plan in accordance with KRS
534.020.
(b) When the order is issued, the court shall set a date, no sooner than eighteen
(18) months after the date of the order, by which the defendant must comply
with the installment payment plan. The applicant shall be given notice of the
total amount due, the payment frequency, and the date by which all payments
must be made. The notice shall state that the expungement cannot be
completed until full payment is received, and that if the applicant has not
completed the installment payment plan by the scheduled date, he or she shall
appear on that date to show good cause as to why he or she is unable to satisfy
the obligations. Notwithstanding provisions of KRS 534.020 to the contrary,
no applicant shall be ordered to jail for failure to complete an installment plan
ordered pursuant to this section.
(c) The revenues and interest from the expungement fee shall be deposited in the
Page 11 of 20
XXXX 2/26/2026 6:36 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1279
expungement fund created in KRS 431.0795.
(12) An applicant seeking to expunge a conviction that is an eligible conviction as
defined in Section 1 of this Act shall not be required to pay the filing fee and
expungement fee.
(13)[(12)] This section shall be retroactive.
Section 4. KRS 431.074 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Administrative Office of the Courts shall retain an index of expungement
orders entered under KRS 431.073 ,[or ]431.076, 431.078, and Section 1 of this
Act.
(2) The index shall only be accessible to persons preparing a certification of eligibility
for expungement pursuant to KRS 431.079 or the Kentucky Law Enforcement
Council for the purpose of verifying qualifications under KRS 15.382.
(3) If the index indicates that the person applying for expungement has had a prior
felony expunged under KRS 431.073, the person preparing the report may,
notwithstanding the provisions of KRS 431.073, access the expunged record and
include information from the expunged record in the certification.
(4) No later than December 1, 2032, the Administrative Office of the Courts shall
create a process that allows a person to confidentially determine whether his or
her conviction records have been expunged pursuant to Section 1, 3, or 5 of this
Act or KRS 431.076.
Section 5. KRS 431.078 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Any person who has been convicted of:
(a) A misdemeanor, a violation, or a traffic infraction not otherwise classified as a
misdemeanor or violation, or a series of misdemeanors, violations, or traffic
infractions arising from a single incident; or
(b) A series of misdemeanors, violations, or traffic infractions not arising from a
single incident;
Page 12 of 20
XXXX 2/26/2026 6:36 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1279
may petition the court in which he was convicted for expungement of his
misdemeanor or violation record within that judicial district, including a record of
any charges for misdemeanors, violations, or traffic infractions that were dismissed
or amended in the criminal action. The person shall be informed of the right at the
time of adjudication.
(2) Except as provided in KRS 218A.275(8) and 218A.276(8), the petition shall be
filed no sooner than five (5) years after the completion of the person's sentence or
five (5) years after the successful completion of the person's probation, whichever
occurs later.
(3) Upon the filing of a petition, the court shall set a date for a hearing, no sooner than
thirty (30) days after the filing of the petition, and shall notify the county attorney;
the victim of the crime, if there was an identified victim; and any other person
whom the person filing the petition has reason to believe may have relevant
information related to the expungement of the record. Inability to locate the victim
shall not delay the proceedings in the case or preclude the holding of a hearing or
the issuance of an order of expungement.
(4) For a petition brought under subsection (1)(a) of this section, the court shall order
expunged all records in the custody of the court and any records in the custody of
any other agency or official, including law enforcement records, if at the hearing
the court finds that:
(a) The offense was not a sex offense or an offense committed against a child;
(b) The person had not in the five (5) years prior to the filing of the petition for
expungement been convicted of a felony or a misdemeanor;
(c) No proceeding concerning a felony or misdemeanor is pending or being
instituted against the person; and
(d) The offense is not one subject to enhancement for a second or subsequent
offense or the time for such an enhancement has expired.
Page 13 of 20
XXXX 2/26/2026 6:36 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1279
(5) For a petition brought under subsection (1)(b) of this section, the court may order
expunged all records in the custody of the court and any records in the custody of
any other agency or official, including law enforcement records, if at the hearing
the court finds that:
(a) The offense was not a sex offense or an offense committed against a child;
(b) The person had not in the five (5) years prior to the filing of the petition for
expungement been convicted of a felony or a misdemeanor;
(c) No proceeding concerning a felony or misdemeanor is pending or being
instituted against the person; and
(d) The offense is not one subject to enhancement for a second or subsequent
offense or the time for such an enhancement has expired.
(6) Upon the entry of an order to expunge the records, the proceedings in the case shall
be deemed never to have occurred; the court and other agencies shall cause records
to be deleted or removed from their computer systems so that the matter shall not
appear on official state-performed background checks; the persons and the court
may properly reply that no record exists with respect to the persons upon any
inquiry in the matter; and the person whose record is expunged shall not have to
disclose the fact of the record or any matter relating thereto on an application for
employment, credit, or other type of application.
(7) Except as provided in subsection (8) of this section, the filing fee for a petition
under this section shall be one hundred dollars ($100). The first fifty dollars ($50)
of each fee collected pursuant to this subsection shall be deposited into a trust and
agency account for deputy clerks and shall not be refundable.
(8) A person filing a petition under this section for a conviction that is an eligible
conviction as defined under Section 1 of this Act shall not be required to pay the
filing fee under subsection (7) of this Act.
(9) Copies of the order shall be sent to each agency or official named therein.
Page 14 of 20
XXXX 2/26/2026 6:36 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1279
[(9) Inspection of the records included in the order may thereafter be permitted by the
court only upon petition by the person who is the subject of the records and only to
those persons named in the petition.]
(10) This section shall be deemed to be retroactive, and any person who has been
convicted of a misdemeanor prior to July 14, 1992, may petition the court in which
he was convicted, or if he was convicted prior to the inception of the District Court
to the District Court in the county where he now resides, for expungement of the
record of one (1) misdemeanor offense or violation or a series of misdemeanor
offenses or violations arising from a single incident, provided that the offense was
not one specified in subsection (4) and that the offense was not the precursor
offense of a felony offense for which he was subsequently convicted. This section
shall apply only to offenses against the Commonwealth of Kentucky.
(11) As used in this section, "violation" has the same meaning as in KRS 500.080.
(12) Any person denied an expungement prior to June 25, 2013, due to the presence of a
traffic infraction on his or her record may file a new petition for expungement of
the previously petitioned offenses, which the court shall hear and decide under the
terms of this section. [No ]Court costs or other fees, from the court or any other
agency, shall not be required of a person filing a new petition under this subsection.
Section 6. KRS 431.079 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Every petition or application filed seeking expungement of a conviction shall
include a certification of eligibility for expungement. The Department of Kentucky
State Police and the Administrative Office of the Courts shall certify that the
agencies have conducted a criminal background check on the petitioner and
whether or not the petitioner is eligible to have the requested record expunged. The
Department of Kentucky State Police shall promulgate administrative regulations to
implement this section, in consultation with the Administrative Office of the
Courts.
Page 15 of 20
XXXX 2/26/2026 6:36 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1279
(2) [Nothing in ]This section shall not be construed to prohibit the expungement of a
case ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction.
(3) For the purposes of this section, KRS 431.073, 431.076, and 431.078, and Section
1 of this Act, "expunge" or "expungement" means the removal or deletion of
records by the court and other agencies which prevents the matter from appearing
on official state-performed background checks.
(4) (a) A clerk or deputy clerk acting in good faith in the performance of his or her
ministerial duties under Section 1, 3, or 5 of this Act or KRS 431.076 shall
be immune from any civil liability.
(b) The immunity provided under this subsection shall not be construed to
abrogate or limit any privilege, immunity, or matter of defense otherwise
available and shall not constitute a waiver of any privilege, immunity, or
matter of defense, including sovereign immunity, qualified immunity, or
quasi-judicial immunity.
Section 7. KRS 17.151 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Department of Kentucky State Police shall, in cooperation with the
Administrative Office of the Courts, the Department of Juvenile Justice, the Cabinet
for Health and Family Services, and the Department of Corrections, be responsible
for the recording of those data elements that are needed for development of the
centralized criminal history record information system.
(2) The database shall at a minimum contain the information required in KRS 27A.310
to 27A.440.
(3) The Department of Kentucky State Police shall provide access to the
Administrative Office of the Courts, the Department of Juvenile Justice, the Cabinet
for Health and Family Services, and the Department of Corrections to its database.
(4) The Department of Kentucky State Police, the Department of Juvenile Justice, the
Cabinet for Health and Family Services, and the Department of Corrections shall
Page 16 of 20
XXXX 2/26/2026 6:36 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1279
assign the same identification number or other variable to each person whose name
appears in the database.
(5) The Department of Kentucky State Police shall provide to the Administrative
Office of the Courts any data necessary to assist with the generation of the list
described in subsection (2) of Section 1 of this Act, including but not limited to
the person's personally identifying information and offense date.
Section 8. KRS 196.093 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The department[ of Corrections] shall, in cooperation with the Department of
Kentucky State Police, the Department of Juvenile Justice, the Cabinet for Health
and Family Services, and the Administrative Office of the Courts, be responsible
for the recording of those data elements that are needed for the development of the
centralized criminal history record information system.
(2) The database shall at a minimum contain the information required in KRS 27A.310
to 27A.440.
(3) The department[ of Corrections] shall provide access to the Department of
Kentucky State Police, the Department of Juvenile Justice, the Cabinet for Health
and Family Services, and the Administrative Office of the Courts to its database.
(4) The department[ of Corrections] shall assign the same identification number or
other variable to each person whose name appears in the database.
(5) The department shall provide to the Administrative Office of the Courts any data
necessary to assist with the generation of the list described in subsection (2) of
Section 1 of this Act, including but not limited to the person's personally
identifying information and the completion date of his or her term of
incarceration, probation, conditional discharge, or parole.
Section 9. KRS 367.310 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A[No] consumer reporting agency shall not maintain any information in its files
relating to any charge in a criminal case, in any court of this Commonwealth, unless
Page 17 of 20
XXXX 2/26/2026 6:36 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1279
the charge has resulted in a conviction.
(2) A conviction that has been overruled, vacated, set aside, or expunged shall not be
included on any background check or consumer report.
Section 10. The Legislative Research Commission shall establish the Automatic
Expungement Task Force. The task force shall review, study, and make recommendations
regarding the:
(1) Feasibility of expanding automatic expungements for offenses occurring prior
to January 1, 2027, and explore alternatives to expungement to reduce the records of
convictions for violations, misdemeanors, and certain low-level felonies;
(2) Estimated workload, accounting for personnel and time, for counties of
varying populations to complete the automatic expungement process identified or
recommended by the task force for expungable convictions having an offense date prior
to January 1, 2027;
(3) Data required to be provided to the Administrative Office of the Courts to
perform an automatic expungement for an expungable conviction having an offense date
prior to January 1, 2027;
(4) Estimated volume of eligible convictions that would be immediately
expungable pursuant to Section 1 of this Act if the automatic expungement process was
enacted to include eligible convictions with an offense date occurring on or after January
1, 2020, and for every subsequent year through 2026.
(5) Total cost estimate to the Court of Justice and any other agencies impacted,
including requisite additional funding needed to implement an automatic expungement
process for expungable convictions having an offense date prior to January 1, 2027, and
to execute the process for all 120 counties on a monthly basis;
(6) Timeframe needed for the Administrative Office of the Courts to procure
resources and implement an automatic expungement process for expungable convictions
having an offense date prior to January, 1, 2027;
Page 18 of 20
XXXX 2/26/2026 6:36 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1279
(7) Design and implementation of the process to support automatic expungement
of expungable convictions for offenses occurring prior to January 1, 2027;
(8) Barriers to the timely destruction of court records under the record retention
schedules of the Court of Justice and Department of Kentucky State Police involving
violations, misdemeanors, and low-level felonies; and
(9) Barriers to the timely destruction of court and law enforcement records
involving violations, misdemeanors, and low-level felonies.
Section 11. The Automatic Expungement Task Force shall be composed of the
following members with final membership of the task force being subject to the
consideration and approval of the Legislative Research Commission:
(1) The Speaker of the House of Representatives, or his or her designee, who
shall serve as co-chair of the task force;
(2) The President of the Senate, or his or her designee, who shall serve as co-chair
of the task force;
(3) A representative from the Administrative Office of the Courts appointed by
the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court;
(4) The president of the Kentucky Circuit Judges' Association, or his or her
designee;
(5) The president of the Kentucky District Judges' Association, or his or her
designee;
(6) The president of the Kentucky Association of Circuit Clerks, or his or her
designee;
(7) The president of the Kentucky Sheriffs' Association, or his or her designee;
(8) The president of the Kentucky Association of Chiefs of Police, or his or her
designee;
(9) Two representatives from the Department of Kentucky State Police appointed
by the secretary of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet;
Page 19 of 20
XXXX 2/26/2026 6:36 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1279
(10) The president of the Kentucky Commonwealth's Attorneys' Association, or
his or her designee;
(11) The president of the County Attorneys Association, or his or her designee;
(12) The public advocate, or his or her designee; and
(13) Three representatives from the Clean Slate Kentucky coalition, including at
least one impacted individual.
Section 12. Provisions of Sections 10 to 14 of this Act to the contrary
notwithstanding, the Legislative Research Commission shall have the authority to
alternatively assign the issues identified herein to an interim joint committee or
subcommittee thereof, and to designate a study completion date.
Section 13. The Automatic Expungement Task Force shall meet at least
monthly during the 2026 Interim of the General Assembly unless otherwise directed by
the Legislative Research Commission, and shall be staffed by the Legislative Research
Commission.
Section 14. The Automatic Expungement Task Force shall submit a report of its
findings and recommendations to the Legislative Research Commission no later than
November 1, 2026, for referral to the General Assembly and consideration in the 2027
Regular Session. The report may include a legislative proposal.
Section 15. Sections 10 to 14 of this Act shall have the same legal status as a
Senate Concurrent Resolution.
Section 16. This Act may be cited as the Automatic Expungement Act.
Page 20 of 20
XXXX 2/26/2026 6:36 PM Jacketed